Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.580

Database of state agency contracts for personal services—State expenditure information website.

(1) The department of enterprise services shall make electronically available to the public a database of state agency contracts for personal services required to be filed with the department of enterprise services under *chapter 39.29 RCW.

(2) The state expenditure information website described in RCW 44.48.150 shall include a link to the department of enterprise services database described in subsection (1) of this section.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 534; 2008 c 326 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 39.29 RCW was repealed by 2012 c 224 s 29, effective January 1, 2013. See chapter 39.26 RCW.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Intent—2008 c 236: See note following RCW 44.48.150.